Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.300

Juvenile runaways—Policy manual.

The criminal justice training commission shall ensure that every law enforcement agency in the state has an accurate and up-to-date policy manual describing the statutes relating to juvenile runaways.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 509.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.